Louisiana, session 2026, HB368.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 25:762.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§762.1. Commission enforcement powers; city of New Orleans
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in the city of
New Orleans, any owner, agent, lessee, or other person acting for or in conjunction
with him who demolishes a structure or edifice located in the city of New Orleans
without having received an appropriate certificate of appropriateness may be fined
a single fine of not more than the greater of twenty-five fifty thousand dollars or
fifteen percent of the assessed value of the structure or edifice in accordance with the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 368 ENROLLED
assessed value immediately preceding the demolition as provided for in the tax rolls
of the city.
B. The municipality or parish shall have a lien and privilege against the
immovable property in or on which the violation occurred. The lien and privilege
shall secure all fines, costs, and penalties which are assessed by the municipality or
parish in accordance with this Section and described in the order, judgment, notice
of judgment, or lien. For the lien and privilege to arise and exist, the order, judgment,
notice of judgment, or lien assessing any fines, costs, and penalties shall be recorded
in the mortgage office of the parish in which the immovable property, or any portion
thereof, in or on which the violation occurred, is situated. The recordation shall have
the effect of a judicial mortgage against the immovable property described therein
and may be enforced against the immovable property described therein upon
application of the municipality or parish to the clerk of the district court for issuance
of a writ in accordance with Code of Civil Procedure Article 2253. The remedies
established in this Chapter are nonexclusive and may be pursued independently of
each other and in addition to other remedies provided by law. In order for the lien
and privilege to arise, the order, judgment, notice of judgment, or lien shall be final
and not subject to appeal when recorded in the mortgage office. The lien and
privilege shall have ranking as provided by R.S. 9:4821(A)(1).
C. Any liens placed against such immovable property shall be included in
the next annual ad valorem tax bill and shall be paid along with such taxes, subject,
however, to any valid homestead exemption. Failure to pay the liens shall cause the
immovable property in or on which the violation occurred to be subject to the same
provisions of law that govern tax liens on immovable property in accordance with
the property tax lien auction procedures as set forth in R.S. 47:2122 et seq. In
addition, failure to pay the liens shall also cause such liens and privileges to be
subject to enforcement in accordance with R.S. 13:2576. Any liens placed against
immovable property that has a legal homestead exemption from taxes will become
payable ninety days after the death of the owner thereof or immediately upon
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 368 ENROLLED
recordation of any conventional mortgage on the immovable property or transfer of
title to a new owner, whichever occurs first.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.